Connecticut, session 2026, SB00378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (83) of section 12-81 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to assessment years
4 commencing on or after October 1, 2026):
5 (83) (A) (i) That fractional share of a dwelling, including a
6 condominium, as defined in section 47-68a, a unit in a common interest
7 community, as defined in section 47-202, and a mobile manufactured
8 home, as defined in section 12-63a, and the lot upon which such
9 dwelling sits, not to exceed two acres thereof, (I) that belongs to or is
10 held in trust for any resident of this state who has served in the Army,
11 Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Air Force or Space Force of the
12 United States and has been determined by the United States Department
13 of Veterans Affairs to be permanently and totally disabled based on a
14 service-connected disability rating of one hundred per cent, or that is
LCO No. 2294 1 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
15 possessed by such a resident as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of
16 years liable for property tax under section 12-48, and (II) that is occupied
17 by such resident as the resident's primary residence, or (ii) lacking such
18 residence, one motor vehicle that belongs to or is held in trust for such
19 resident and is garaged in this state. As used in this subdivision,
20 "dwelling" does not include any portion of the unit or structure used by
21 such resident for commercial purposes or from which such resident
22 derives any rental income.
23 (B) If such resident lacks such dwelling or motor vehicle in such
24 resident's name, the dwelling or motor vehicle, as applicable, belonging
25 to or held in trust for such resident's spouse, or possessed by such
26 resident's spouse as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of years liable
27 for property tax under section 12-48, who is domiciled with such
28 resident, shall be so exempt. When any resident entitled to an exemption
29 under the provisions of this subdivision has died, the dwelling or motor
30 vehicle, as applicable, belonging to or held in trust for such deceased
31 resident's surviving spouse, or possessed by such deceased resident's
32 spouse as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of years liable for property
33 tax under section 12-48, while such spouse remains a widow or
34 widower, or belonging to or held in trust for such deceased resident's
35 minor children during their minority, or both, while they are residents
36 of this state, shall be so exempt as that to which such resident was or
37 would have been entitled at the time of such resident's death.
38 (C) No individual entitled to the exemption under this subdivision
39 and under one or more of subdivisions (19), (22), (23), (25) and (26) of
40 this section or sections 12-81pp, as amended by this act, and 12-81qq
41 shall receive more than one exemption.
42 (D) [(i)] No individual shall receive any exemption to which such
43 individual is entitled under this subdivision until such individual has
44 complied with section 12-95, and has submitted proof of such
45 individual's determination by the United States Department of Veterans
46 Affairs, to the assessor of the town in which the exemption is sought. If
LCO No. 2294 2 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
47 there is no change to an individual's determination, such proof shall not
48 be required for any assessment year following that for which the
49 exemption under this subdivision is granted initially. If the United
50 States Department of Veterans Affairs modifies an individual's
51 determination to other than permanently and totally disabled based on
52 a service-connected disability rating of one hundred per cent, such
53 modification shall be deemed a waiver of the right to the exemption
54 under this subdivision. Any such individual whose determination was
55 modified to other than permanently and totally disabled based on a
56 service-connected disability rating of one hundred per cent may seek
57 the exemption under subdivision (20) of this section.
58 [(ii) Any individual who has been unable to submit evidence of such
59 determination by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in
60 the manner required by this subdivision, or who has failed to submit
61 such evidence as provided in section 12-95, may, when such individual
62 obtains such evidence, make application to the tax collector not later
63 than one year after such individual obtains such proof or not later than
64 one year after the expiration of the time limited in section 12-95, as the
65 case may be, for abatement in case the tax has not been paid, or for
66 refund in case the whole tax or part of the tax has been paid. Such
67 abatement or refund may be granted retroactively to include the
68 assessment day next succeeding the date as of which such individual
69 was entitled to such determination by the United States Department of
70 Veterans Affairs, but in no case shall any abatement or refund be made
71 for a period greater than three years.
72 (iii) The tax collector shall, after examination of such application, refer
73 the same, with the tax collector's recommendations thereon, to the board
74 of selectmen of a town or to the corresponding authority of any other
75 municipality, and shall certify to the amount of abatement or refund to
76 which the applicant is entitled. Upon receipt of such application and
77 certification, the selectmen or other duly constituted authority shall, in
78 case the tax has not been paid, issue a certificate of abatement or, in case
79 the whole tax or part of the tax has been paid, draw an order upon the
LCO No. 2294 3 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
80 treasurer in favor of such applicant for such amount, without interest.
81 Any action so taken by such selectmen or other authority shall be a
82 matter of record and the tax collector shall be notified in writing of such
83 action.
84 (E) For assessment years commencing on and after October 1, 2025,
85 any municipality may, by vote of its legislative body or, in a
86 municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of
87 the board of selectmen, provide that, for any individual receiving the
88 exemption under this subdivision for a dwelling described in
89 subparagraph (A)(i) of this subdivision, not more than two acres of the
90 lot upon which such dwelling sits shall be exempt from taxation.]
91 [(F)] (E) For assessment years commencing on and after October 1,
92 2025, any municipality may, by vote of its legislative body or, in a
93 municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of
94 the board of selectmen, provide that the surviving spouse of any
95 resident of this state who (i) had served in the Army, Navy, Marine
96 Corps, Coast Guard, Air Force or Space Force of the United States, (ii)
97 had been determined by the United States Department of Veterans
98 Affairs to be permanently and totally disabled based on a service-
99 connected disability rating of one hundred per cent, and (iii) died prior
100 to October 1, 2024, but after a date to be determined by such legislative
101 body or board of selectmen, as applicable, shall, while such spouse
102 remains a widow or widower, be entitled to the exemption or
103 exemptions under this subdivision.
104 [(G)] (F) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, for
105 assessment years commencing on and after October 1, 2025, any
106 municipality may, by vote of its legislative body or, in a municipality
107 where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of the board of
108 selectmen, limit the total amount of the exemption or exemptions
109 granted under this subdivision to the median assessed valuation of
110 residential real property in such municipality.
LCO No. 2294 4 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
111 Sec. 2. Section 12-81pp of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
112 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
113 October 1, 2026, and applicable to assessment years commencing on or after
114 October 1, 2026):
115 (a) [Any] Prior to October 1, 2026, any municipality, upon approval
116 by its legislative body, may provide, and on and after October 1, 2026,
117 each municipality shall provide, that, in lieu of the exemption
118 prescribed under subdivision (20) of section 12-81, any resident of this
119 state who has served in the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard,
120 Air Force or Space Force of the United States and has been determined
121 by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to have a service-
122 connected total disability based on individual unemployability shall be
123 entitled to an exemption from property tax on (1) that fractional share
124 of a dwelling, including a condominium, as defined in section 47-68a, a
125 unit in a common interest community, as defined in section 47-202, and
126 a mobile manufactured home, as defined in section 12-63a, and the lot
127 upon which such dwelling sits, not to exceed two acres thereof, (A) that
128 belongs to or is held in trust for such resident, or that is possessed by
129 such a resident as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of years liable for
130 property tax under section 12-48, and (B) that is occupied by such
131 resident as the resident's primary residence, or (2) lacking such
132 residence, one motor vehicle that belongs to or is held in trust for such
133 resident and is garaged in this state. As used in this subsection,
134 "dwelling" does not include any portion of the unit or structure used by
135 such resident for commercial purposes or from which such resident
136 derives any rental income.
137 (b) If such resident lacks such dwelling or motor vehicle in such
138 resident's name, the dwelling or motor vehicle, as applicable, belonging
139 to or held in trust for such resident's spouse, or possessed by such
140 resident's spouse as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of years liable
141 for property tax under section 12-48, who is domiciled with such
142 resident, shall be so exempt. When any resident entitled to an exemption
143 under the provisions of this section has died, the dwelling or motor
LCO No. 2294 5 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
144 vehicle, as applicable, belonging to or held in trust for such deceased
145 resident's surviving spouse, or possessed by such deceased resident's
146 surviving spouse as a tenant for life or tenant for a term of years liable
147 for property tax under section 12-48, while such spouse remains a
148 widow or widower, or belonging to or held in trust for such deceased
149 resident's minor children during their minority, or both, while they are
150 residents of this state, shall be so exempt as that to which such resident
151 was or would have been entitled at the time of such resident's death.
152 (c) No individual entitled to the exemption under this section and
153 under one or more of subdivisions (19), (22), (23), (25) and (26) of section
154 12-81 or section 12-81qq shall receive more than one exemption.
155 (d) [(1)] No individual shall receive any exemption to which such
156 individual is entitled under this section until such individual has
157 complied with section 12-95 and has submitted proof of such
158 individual's determination by the United States Department of Veterans
159 Affairs, to the assessor of the town in which the exemption is sought. If
160 there is no change to an individual's determination, such proof shall not
161 be required for any assessment year following that for which the
162 exemption under this section is granted initially. If the United States
163 Department of Veterans Affairs modifies an individual's determination
164 to other than a service-connected total disability based on individual
165 unemployability, such modification shall be deemed a waiver of the
166 right to the exemption under this section. Any such individual whose
167 determination was modified to other than a service-connected total
168 disability based on individual unemployability may seek the exemption
169 under subdivision (20) or (83) of section 12-81, as amended by this act,
170 as applicable.
171 [(2) Any individual who has been unable to submit evidence of such
172 determination by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs in
173 the manner required by this section, or who has failed to submit such
174 evidence as provided in section 12-95, may, when such individual
175 obtains such evidence, make application to the tax collector not later
LCO No. 2294 6 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
176 than one year after such individual obtains such proof or not later than
177 one year after the expiration of the time limited in section 12-95, as the
178 case may be, for abatement in case the tax has not been paid, or for
179 refund in case the whole tax or part of the tax has been paid. Such
180 abatement or refund may be granted retroactively to include the
181 assessment day next succeeding the date as of which such individual
182 was entitled to such determination by the United States Department of
183 Veterans Affairs, but in no case shall any abatement or refund be made
184 for a period greater than three years.
185 (3) The tax collector shall, after examination of such application, refer
186 the same, with the tax collector's recommendations thereon, to the board
187 of selectmen of a town or to the corresponding authority of any other
188 municipality, and shall certify to the amount of abatement or refund to
189 which the applicant is entitled. Upon receipt of such application and
190 certification, the selectmen or other duly constituted authority shall, in
191 case the tax has not been paid, issue a certificate of abatement or, in case
192 the whole tax or part of the tax has been paid, draw an order upon the
193 treasurer in favor of such applicant for such amount, without interest.
194 Any action so taken by such selectmen or other authority shall be a
195 matter of record and the tax collector shall be notified in writing of such
196 action.
197 (e) (1) In any municipality that provides the exemption under
198 subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of this section, such municipality may,
199 upon approval by its legislative body, further provide that, for any
200 individual receiving the exemption under said subsections for a
201 dwelling described in subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section,
202 not more than two acres of the lot upon which such dwelling sits shall
203 be exempt from taxation.]
204 [(2)] (e) (1) In any municipality that provides the exemption under
205 subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of this section, such municipality may,
206 upon approval of its legislative body, further provide that the surviving
207 spouse of any resident of this state who (A) had served in the Army,
LCO No. 2294 7 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
208 Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Air Force or Space Force of the
209 United States, (B) had been determined by the United States Department
210 of Veterans Affairs to have a service-connected total disability based on
211 individual unemployability, and (C) died prior to October 1, 2025, but
212 after a date to be determined by such legislative body, shall, while such
213 spouse remains a widow or widower, be entitled to the exemption
214 under this section.
215 [(3)] (2) In any municipality that provides the exemption or
216 exemptions under this section, such municipality may, upon approval
217 of its legislative body, limit the total amount of the exemption or
218 exemptions granted under this section to the median assessed valuation
219 of residential real property in such municipality.
220 Sec. 3. Section 12-93 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
221 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
222 1, 2026, and applicable to assessment years commencing on or after October 1,
223 2026):
224 (a) (1) Any person who claims an exemption from taxation under the
225 provisions of section 12-81, as amended by this act, or 12-82 by reason
226 of service in the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Air Force or
227 Space Force of the United States shall give notice to the town clerk of the
228 town in which he resides that he is entitled to such exemption. Any
229 person who has performed such service may establish his right to such
230 exemption by exhibiting to the town clerk an honorable discharge or a
231 release under honorable conditions, or a certified copy thereof, from
232 such service or, in the absence of such discharge, release or copy, by
233 appearing before the assessors for an examination under oath,
234 supported by two affidavits of disinterested persons, showing that the
235 claimant is a veteran, as defined in section 27-103, or is serving or, if he
236 is unable to appear by reason of such service, he may establish such
237 right, until such time as he appears personally and exhibits his
238 discharge, release or copy, by forwarding to the town clerk annually a
239 written statement, signed by the commanding officer of his unit, ship or
LCO No. 2294 8 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
240 station or by some other appropriate officer, or where such claimant is
241 currently serving in an active theater of war or hostilities, by the
242 presentation of a notarized statement of a parent, guardian, spouse or
243 legal representative of such claimant, stating that he is personally
244 serving and is unable to appear in person by reason of such service,
245 which statement shall be received before the assessment day of the town
246 wherein the exemption is claimed.
247 (2) (A) (i) In the case of any person claiming exemption under
248 subdivision (83) of section 12-81, as amended by this act, such claimant
249 shall annually, not later than [January] March first, submit such claim to
250 the assessors for approval, on an application form prepared for such
251 purpose by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management and to
252 be used for assessment years commencing on and after October 1, 2025,
253 which submission shall include [(1)] (I) all documentation necessary to
254 demonstrate that the resident described in subparagraph (A) of
255 subdivision (83) of section 12-81, as amended by this act, has been
256 determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to be
257 permanently and totally disabled based on a service-connected
258 disability rating of one hundred per cent, and [(2)] (II) an attestation that
259 such claimant has not submitted, and will not submit, a claim for the
260 exemption under subdivision (83) of section 12-81, as amended by this
261 act, in another town.
262 (ii) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A)(i) of this
263 subdivision, any person who, relocating from out of state to a town in
264 this state, acquires the property described in subdivision (83) of section
265 12-81, as amended by this act, and would otherwise have qualified to
266 receive the exemption under subdivision (83) of section 12-81, as
267 amended by this act, but for not having so acquired such property on or
268 before the commencement of an assessment year, may submit a claim
269 for such exemption for such assessment year not later than sixty days
270 after the acquisition of such property, in accordance with the provisions
271 of subparagraph (A)(i) of this subdivision. For any such claim for
272 exemption that is approved, such person's tax liability on such acquired
LCO No. 2294 9 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
273 property shall be prorated to account for such approval.
274 (B) In respect to a taxpayer's annual submission under this
275 subdivision, after the submission and approval for the first year, the
276 assessor in each town shall notify such taxpayer concerning the
277 requirements of this subdivision by regular mail not later than October
278 first annually, enclosing a copy of the required application form. Not
279 later than February fifteenth of each year, the assessor shall notify, by
280 mail evidenced by a certificate of mailing, any such taxpayer to whom
281 such notification concerning such requirements and such application
282 form was mailed by October first, and for whom such application form
283 was not received by February thirteenth, and such taxpayer shall be
284 required to submit such application not later than March first.
285 (b) The assessors shall report to the town clerk all claims so
286 established. Any person claiming exemption by reason of the service of
287 a relative as a soldier, sailor, marine or member of the Coast Guard, Air
288 Force or Space Force may establish his right thereto by at least two
289 affidavits of disinterested persons showing the service of such relative,
290 his honorable discharge, release under honorable conditions or death in
291 service, and the relationship of the claimant to him; and the assessors
292 may further require such person to be examined by them under oath
293 concerning such facts. The town clerk of the town where the honorable
294 discharge, release under honorable conditions or certified copy thereof
295 and each affidavit is originally presented for record shall record such
296 discharge, release or certified copy or affidavits thereof in full and shall
297 list the names of such claimants and such service shall be performed by
298 the town clerk without remuneration therefor. Thereafter if any person
299 entitled to such exemption changes his legal residence, the town clerk in
300 the town of former residence and in which such honorable discharge,
301 release under honorable conditions or certified copy thereof or any such
302 affidavit in respect to such person was originally presented for record
303 shall, upon request and payment of a fee by such person to said town of
304 former residence in an amount determined by the town treasurer as
305 necessary to cover the cost of such procedure, prepare and mail to the
LCO No. 2294 10 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378
306 town in which such person resides, a copy of the record of such
307 discharge, release or certified copy thereof or affidavits, or he may
308 establish his right to such exemption in the town in which he resides by
309 exhibiting to the town clerk thereof the original discharge, release or a
310 certified copy thereof or such affidavits. Said clerk shall take therefrom
311 sufficient data to satisfy the exemption requirements of the general
312 statutes and shall record the same and shall note the town where the
313 original complete recording of discharge papers was made.
314 (c) No board of assessors or board of assessment appeals or other
315 official shall allow any such claim for exemption unless evidence as
316 herein specified has been filed in the office of the town clerk, provided,
317 if any claim for exemption has been allowed by any board of assessors
318 or board of assessment appeals prior to July 1, 1923, the provisions of
319 this section shall not apply to such claim. Each claim granted prior to
320 July 1, 1923, shall be recorded with those presented subsequent thereto,
321 and a list of such names, alphabetically arranged, shall be furnished the
322 assessors by the town clerk.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 12-81(83)
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026, and 12-81pp
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026, and 12-93
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2026
LCO No. 2294 11 of 12

Raised Bill No. 378